Montana, session 2025, SB219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 2-15-1814, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-15-1814. Board of housing -- allocation -- composition -- quasi-judicial. (1) There is a board of
housing.
(2) The board consists of seven members appointed by the governor as provided in 2-15-124. The
members must be informed and experienced in housing, economics, or finance. At least one member must be
an enrolled member of a federally recognized tribe in Montana, and at least one member must be a veteran of
the United States armed forces.
(3) The board shall elect a presiding officer and other necessary officers.
(4) The board is designated as a quasi-judicial board for purposes of 2-15-124.
(5) The board is allocated to the department of commerce for administrative purposes only as
provided in 2-15-121.
(6) In compliance with the state pay plan, the department shall provide all staff and services to the
board that are determined by the board in conjunction with the department to be necessary for the purposes of
carrying out the board's programs. The department shall assess the board for reasonable costs.
(7) A member of the board may not be considered to have a conflict of interest under the
provisions of 2-2-201 merely because the member is a stockholder, officer, or employee of a lending institution
that may participate in the board's programs."

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 219

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 219.1
NEW SECTION. Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 219